Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.29
Lead-based paint profession, defined.

Lead-based paint profession means one of the specific types or categories of lead-based paint activities identified in the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act for which individuals may receive training from an accredited training program and become licensed by the department.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 31;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1271.